Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2772
Income tax; Tax Commissioner; records, form of returns.

The Tax Commissioner may prescribe regulations as to the keeping of records, the content and form of returns and statements, and the filing of copies of federal income returns, or portions thereof as filed with the Internal Revenue Service, and determinations, except that such requirements may be waived if such information can be received from another state or federal agency. The Tax Commissioner may require by regulation or notice the making of such returns, rendering of such statements, or keeping of such records as the Tax Commissioner may deem sufficient to show whether or not there is liability for tax or for the collection of tax.

Laws 1967, c. 487, § 72, p. 1603;

Laws 1985, LB 273, § 61;

Laws 1987, LB 523, § 27.